Massachusetts, session 194th, S3164.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby further amended by inserting after chapter 
2 93L the following chapter:- 
3  Chapter 93M 
4  ONLINE PROTECTION 
5  Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings 
6 unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
7  “Account”, a unique profile for a user of a social media platform. 
8  “Addictive social media feed”, a website, online service, online application or mobile 
9 application, or a portion thereof, in which multiple pieces of content generated or shared by users 
10 of a website, online service, online application or mobile application, either concurrently or 
11 sequentially, are recommended, selected or prioritized for display to a user based, in whole or in 
12 part, on information associated with the user or the user’s device unless, for each such 

2 of 11 13 recommendation, selection or prioritization, any of the following conditions are met, alone or in 
14 combination with one another: 
15  (i) the recommendation, prioritization or selection is based on information that is not 
16 persistently associated with the user or user’s device and does not concern the user’s previous 
17 interactions with content generated or shared by other users unless the content was explicitly 
18 saved by the user; 
19  (ii) the recommendation, prioritization or selection is based on user-selected privacy or 
20 accessibility settings or technical information concerning the user’s device; 
21  (iii) the user expressly and unambiguously: (1) requested the specific content; (2) 
22 subscribed to content by the author, creator or poster of the content; or (3) subscribed to the page 
23 or group to which the content is shared by users; provided, however, that the content is not 
24 recommended, selected or prioritized for display based, in whole or in part, on other information 
25 associated with the user or the user’s device that is not otherwise permissible under this section; 
26 provided further, that “subscribed to” shall include friending, joining or otherwise affirmatively 
27 requesting content from; 
28  (iv) the user expressly and unambiguously requested that specific content, content by a 
29 specified author, creator or poster of content to which the user has subscribed or content shared 
30 by users to a page or group to which the user has subscribed pursuant to clause (iii) be blocked, 
31 prioritized or deprioritized for display; provided, however, that the content is not recommended, 
32 selected or prioritized for display based, in whole or in part, on other information associated with 
33 the user or the user’s device that is not otherwise permissible under this section; 
34  (v) the content is a direct or private communication; 

3 of 11 35  (vi) the content is recommended, selected or prioritized only in direct response to a 
36 specific search inquiry by the user at the time such search inquiry is made; 
37  (vii) the content recommended, selected or prioritized for display is exclusively next in a 
38 pre-existing sequence from the same author, creator, poster or source; or 
39  (viii) the recommendation, prioritization or selection is necessary to comply with the 
40 provisions of this chapter and any regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter. 
41  “Age signal”, a device-level transmission from an operating system provider or 
42 application distribution provider to a covered operator of a categorical age range applicable to 
43 the user of the device that does not require the transmission to the covered operator of such 
44 user’s date of birth, legal name, government-issued identification or biometric identifier. 
45  “Application distribution provider”, a person, business or legal entity that owns, controls 
46 or operates a platform through which software applications are made available for download or 
47 installation by users in the commonwealth. 
48  “Autoplay”, a feature of a social media feed or landing page where content is 
49 automatically played in a social media feed without any manual input from a user. 
50  “Connected account”, an account on a social media platform that is directly connected to 
51 another account by an affirmative request by a user and an affirmative confirmation by another 
52 user. 
53  “Content”, an image, video or text. 
54  “Covered minor”, a user of a website, online service, online application or mobile 

4 of 11 55  application in the commonwealth when the operator of such website, online service, 
56 online application or mobile application has actual knowledge the user is a minor. 
57  “Covered operator”, any person, business or legal entity who operates or provides a 
58 social media platform.  
59  “Educational technology platform”, a software application or web-based technology, 
60 including, but not limited to, a learning management system, designed to provide communication 
61 between a school and students’ parents or guardians, educational information, experiences, 
62 training or instruction to build knowledge, skills or a craft; provided, however, that, for purposes 
63 of this chapter: (i) such software application or web-based technology is approved by the school 
64 district; (ii) the school district complies with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 
65 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, and 34 C.F.R. Part 99, in its use of any software application or web-
66 based technology; and (iii) the school district has an executed student data privacy agreement 
67 governing the use of any software application or web-based technology that collects student data 
68 that includes a requirement that the software application or web-based technology complies with 
69 said Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g and 34 C.F.R. Part 99. 
70  “Infinite scroll”, a feature of a social media feed or landing page that provides an 
71 automatically and continuously loading social media feed or landing page where additional 
72 content displays at the bottom of such feed or landing page without any manual input from a 
73 user. 
74  “Minor”, an individual under the age of 18. 

5 of 11 75  “Operating system provider”, a person, business or legal entity that designs, develops or 
76 distributes software that manages the hardware of an internet-enabled device, including a mobile 
77 device, tablet or computer, and allows programs and applications to run on such device. 
78  “Parent”, a parent or legal guardian of a minor. 
79  “Precise geolocation data”, information derived from technology, including, but not 
80 limited to, latitude and longitude coordinates from global positioning system mechanisms or 
81 other similar positional data, that reveals the past or present physical location of a user or device 
82 that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to 1 or more users with precision and accuracy 
83 within a radius of 1,750 feet. 
84  “Push notification”, an automatic electronic message displayed on a user’s personal 
85 electronic device when the social media platform is not actively open or visible on the personal 
86 electronic device that prompts the user to use and interact with the social media platform. 
87  “Social media feed”, the presentation of content to users of a social media platform that 
88 has been recommended, selected or prioritized for presentation or display to a user. 
89  “Social media platform”, a public website, online service, online application or mobile 
90 application that primarily serves as a medium for displaying content generated by users through a 
91 social media feed and that allows users to create, share, view and interact with user-generated 
92 content; provided, however, that “social media platform” shall not include: (i) email, short 
93 message service, multimedia message service, rich communication service or similar text 
94 messaging telecommunications services; (ii) cloud storage services; (iii) online services or 
95 applications with the primary purpose to facilitate the purchase or sale of goods or services 
96 between buyers and sellers, including, but not limited to, online marketplaces that enable users to 

6 of 11 97 list, search for, purchase or review products or services, where any user-to-user communication 
98 or user-generated content is incidental to such commercial transactions; (iv) an educational 
99 technology platform; or (v) document viewing, sharing or collaboration services. 
100  “User”, an individual who, through an account, accesses or uses either a social media 
101 feed or a social media platform in the commonwealth; provided, however, that “user” shall not 
102 include an individual acting as a covered operator, or agent or affiliate of the covered operator, of 
103 such social media feed or social media platform or any portion thereof. 
104  Section 2. (a)(1) A covered operator shall use commercially reasonable and technically 
105 feasible methods to determine if a user is a covered minor unless the user opts out of such 
106 methods; provided, however, that the covered operator shall provide the user with a clear, simple 
107 and prominent opportunity to opt out of such methods prior to using them. The covered operator 
108 shall set default social media platform safety settings for a user determined to be a covered 
109 minor, or for a user that opts out of such methods, that shall: 
110  (i) disable an addictive social media feed; 
111  (ii) disable push notifications to a user between the hours of 12:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m. in 
112 the commonwealth’s time zone; 
113  (iii) disable autoplay or other auto-advance functions that continuously present content to 
114 a user;  
115  (iv) disable infinite scroll or other endless scrolling or pagination functions; and 
116  (v) require a clear and conspicuous reminder after the user has accessed the social media 
117 platform for more than 1 cumulative hour of use in any 24-hour period and every 30 minutes of 

7 of 11 118 cumulative use thereafter that the user has accessed the social media platform for any such 
119 amount of time; provided, however, that the social media platform shall require the user to 
120 acknowledge the reminder before continuing use of the social media platform. 
121  (2) A covered operator shall not allow a user to change the default settings enabled 
122 pursuant to paragraph (1) unless the covered operator has used commercially reasonable and 
123 technically feasible methods to determine that the user is not a covered minor pursuant to section 
124 3. 
125  (b)(1) If a covered operator has actual knowledge that a user is a minor, the covered 
126 operator shall enable default social media platform safety settings for the covered minor’s 
127 account that shall: 
128  (i) restrict the visibility of the content on a covered minor’s account to only connected 
129 accounts; provided, however, that information necessary for users to search for and connect to a 
130 covered minor’s account, including, but not limited to, the covered minor’s name, may be made 
131 visible; 
132  (ii) disable the visibility or sharing of the covered minor’s precise geolocation data with 
133 other users; 
134  (iii) limit the covered minor’s sharing of content to connected accounts; and 
135  (iv) limit the covered minor’s direct messaging to connected accounts. 
136  (2) A covered operator may permit a covered minor to change the default settings enabled 
137 pursuant to clauses (i), (iii) and (iv) of paragraph (1). The default settings required in clause (ii) 
138 of said paragraph (1) may only be changed with verifiable parental consent. The attorney general 

8 of 11 139 shall promulgate regulations identifying methods of obtaining such verifiable parental consent. 
140 Information collected for the purpose of obtaining such verifiable parental consent shall not be 
141 used for any purpose other than obtaining verifiable parental consent and shall be deleted 
142 immediately after an attempt to obtain verifiable parental consent, except where necessary for 
143 compliance with any applicable provisions of state or federal law or regulation. Nothing in this 
144 chapter shall be construed as requiring a social media platform to provide a parent any additional 
145 or special access to or control over the data or accounts of their covered minor child. The default 
146 setting provided in clause (ii) of paragraph (1) shall be adjustable with verifiable parental consent 
147 in a manner that allows the sharing of the covered minor’s precise geolocation location data with 
148 only selected individual connected accounts. 
149  (3) A covered operator shall not: (i) provide a user with an option to change more than 1 
150 such default setting at once; or (ii) request or prompt a user to change any such default settings, 
151 unless the change is necessary for the user to access a service or feature they have expressly and 
152 unambiguously requested. 
153  (4) A covered operator may, but shall not be required to, use commercially reasonable 
154 and technically feasible methods to determine if a user is a covered minor for the purpose of this 
155 subsection pursuant to regulations promulgated by the attorney general pursuant to section 3. 
156  (c) No covered operator shall withhold, degrade or lower the quality or increase the price 
157 of any product, service or feature to a user who uses the social media platform with the default 
158 settings under subsections (a) or (b) enabled. 

9 of 11 159  Section 3. (a) The attorney general shall promulgate regulations identifying commercially 
160 reasonable and technically feasible methods for covered operators to determine if a user is a 
161 covered minor for the purposes of subsection (a) of section 2. 
162  (b) The attorney general may consider among the methods identified under subsection 
163 (a), an age signal as a commercially reasonable and technically feasible method for determining 
164 whether a user is a covered minor and may, by regulation, require an operating system provider 
165 to provide covered operators with such age signal. 
166  (c) In promulgating regulations pursuant to this section, the attorney general shall 
167 consider: (i) the size and financial resources of the social media platform; (ii) the costs and 
168 effectiveness of available age assurance methods; and (iii) the impact of the age assurance 
169 methods on users’ safety, utility and experience. 
170  (d) Regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall: (i) set forth multiple methods 
171 for a covered operator to determine if a user is a covered minor, including, but not limited to, at 
172 least 1 method that either does not rely solely on government issued identification or that allows 
173 a user to maintain anonymity as to the covered operator of the social media platform; (ii) limit 
174 the collection of personal data of a user to data that is strictly necessary for determining a user’s 
175 age; (iii) require the deletion of personal data collected for the purpose of determining if a user is 
176 a covered minor, other than the determination of the user’s age, immediately after making such 
177 determination; (iv) prohibit the use of any personal data collected for the purpose of determining 
178 if a user is a covered minor for any other purpose; (v) prohibit the combination of personal data 
179 collected for the purpose of determining if a user is a covered minor, except the determination of 

10 of 11 180 the user’s age, with any other personal data of the user; and (vi) require the implementation of a 
181 review process to allow users to appeal an age assurance determination. 
182  (e) If a covered operator has used commercially reasonable and technically feasible age 
183 assurance methods in compliance with such regulations and has not determined that a user is a 
184 covered minor, the covered operator shall operate under the presumption that the user is not a 
185 covered minor for the purposes of this chapter, unless it obtains actual knowledge that the user is 
186 a covered minor. 
187  (f) A covered operator that uses commercially reasonable and technically feasible age 
188 assurance methods in compliance with regulations promulgated pursuant to this section and 
189 prohibits any user it determines to be a covered minor from accessing the social media platform 
190 shall be exempt from the requirements in section 2.  
191  Section 4. A covered operator shall provide the attorney general with de-identified 
192 aggregate data on minors’ use of the social media platform not less than quarterly. Such data 
193 shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of minors who use the platform, delineated by 
194 age or age range; (ii) the amount of time minors spend on the platform, delineated by age or age 
195 range; and (iii) the frequency and type of modification of default settings for minors’ social 
196 media accounts. The attorney general shall make such data available to the public on its website. 
197 The attorney general may promulgate regulations requiring the reporting of additional de-
198 identified aggregate data about minors’ use of social media platforms. 
199  Section 5. (a) A violation by a covered operator of this chapter shall constitute an unfair 
200 or deceptive act or practice in violation of chapter 93A. Notwithstanding sections 9 and 11 of 

11 of 11 201 said chapter 93A, the attorney general shall have exclusive authority to bring a civil action 
202 against a covered operator that violates this chapter.  
203  (b) A covered operator found to be in violation of section 2 shall be punished by a civil 
204 fine of not more than $5,000 per violation; provided, however, that a covered operator shall be in 
205 violation of section 2 for each user account not in compliance with section 2. 
206  (c) A covered operator that violates section 4 shall be liable for a civil penalty of not 
207 more than $1,000,000. Each day the violation of section 4 persists shall be a separate violation. 
208  Section 6. Nothing in this chapter shall authorize access to a social media platform or to 
209 content on a social media platform by an individual otherwise prohibited from doing so under 
210 state or federal law.  
211  Section 7. The attorney general may promulgate regulations to implement this chapter. 
212  Section 8. The office of the attorney general shall maintain on its website an online 
213 submission platform to receive complaints, information or referrals from members of the public 
214 concerning a social media platform’s alleged compliance or non-compliance with this chapter.  
215  SECTION 2. Not later than March 1, 2027, the attorney general shall promulgate 
216 regulations pursuant to chapter 93M of the General Laws. 
217  SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect on August 1, 2027.